src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! # Verbs
!! [Original file](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc)

LEXICON verbs
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** = 

mända+V:män V_PESTA  "mennä" ;
ei+V+Aux:e V_EI  "ei" ;
olda+V:o V_OLDA  "olla" ;
oigeta+V:oige V_OIGETA  "lähettää" ;
pesta+V:pez V_PESTA  "pestä" ;
sugida+V:sugi V_SUGIDA  "sukia" ;
tugeta+V:tuge V_TUGETA  "tukea" ;
tulda+V:tul V_PESTA  "tulla" ;
valita+V:vali V_VALITA  "valita" ;
